Alaska statutes. Title 47. Welfare, Social Services, and Institutions.
Article 6. Traumatic or Acquired Brain Injury.

Effective dates. —

Section 5, ch. 109, SLA 2010, which enacted this article, makes this article effective September 23, 2010.

Sec. 47.80.500.
Statewide traumatic or acquired brain injury program.

A statewide traumatic or acquired brain injury program is established in the department for the purpose of evaluating the effectiveness and availability of information and services for the prevention and treatment of traumatic or acquired brain injury in the state. The department shall consult and collaborate with state agencies, private nonprofit entities, and other organizations in the state that provide brain injury services in implementing all aspects of the program.

The program established under this section must include

review and consideration of data collected under (c)(1) of this section;

supervision and coordination of services provided to persons with traumatic or acquired brain injury;

evaluation of standards pertaining to the treatment, care, and support of persons with traumatic or acquired brain injury;

assessment of the availability of acute and long-term treatment, care, and support options in and outside the state for persons with traumatic or acquired brain injury;

evaluation of the need for and scope of community services for persons with traumatic or acquired brain injury throughout the state;

investigation of the models of service coordination that can be replicated at a local level in the state;

coordination and expansion of publicly and privately funded residential and nonresidential acute and long-term services to persons with traumatic or acquired brain injury, including education, referral, and home and community-based services;

facilitation of admissions to and discharges from acute and long-term care facilities for the treatment of traumatic or acquired brain injury;

identification and description of available treatment and care facilities of all types for persons with traumatic or acquired brain injury based on length of stay, patient capacity, available services, and barriers encountered to community placement after discharge;

a plan that describes recommendations for the development of a statewide service delivery continuum of comprehensive rehabilitative, supportive living, and community programs.

The department shall

establish and implement a traumatic or acquired brain injury registry of information from service providers that includes

health status, including age, cause, and severity of injury and region of brain affected;

acute recovery period;

location of the

event that caused the injury;

hospital treating the injury; and

residence of the person with traumatic or acquired brain injury;

access to and use of rehabilitation services, including behavioral, vocational, and long-term care services;

access to and use of neuropsychological assessment;

status of long-term recovery at five-year intervals;

financial and social effects on family;

cost associated with services;

establish standards and recommendations for improvement of prevention, assessment, treatment, and care of persons with traumatic or acquired brain injury in the state;

contract with service providers and qualified entities to carry out the purposes of this section;

provide a standardized reporting form for use in gathering data for the registry.

In (c) of this section, “service provider” means a public or private entity that provides health education, group shelter, or criminal justice services to individuals in the state.

History.

(§ 5 ch 109 SLA 2010)

Sec. 47.80.529.
Definition.

In AS

47.80.500

—

47.80.529

, “traumatic or acquired brain injury” means an insult from physical force or internal damage to the brain or its coverings, not of a degenerative or congenital nature, that produces an altered mental state and that results in a decrease in cognitive, behavioral, emotional, or physical functioning.

History.

(§ 5 ch 109 SLA 2010)

Revisor’s notes. —

Enacted as AS 47.80.590; renumbered in 2010, at which time an internal reference was conformed.